Hawaii statutes.
§425-156 Foreign limited liability
partnerships. (a) Before transacting business in this State, a foreign
limited liability partnership shall register pursuant to part I of this
chapter, file a statement of foreign qualification with the director, and submit
a certificate of good standing or other similar record duly authenticated by
the secretary of state or other official having custody of limited liability
partnership records in the state or country under whose law it was formed;
provided that the certificate shall be dated not earlier than sixty days prior
to the filing of the application. If the certificate is in a foreign language,
a translation attested to under oath by the translator shall accompany the
certificate. (b) A foreign limited liability partnership shall not be denied
a statement of foreign qualification by reason of any difference between the
law under which the partnership was formed and the law of this State. [L 2000,
c 218, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 241, §4; am L 2002, c 130, §88; am L 2003, c 124,
§53]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next